Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1669.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Emergency
Management Funding Modernization Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Emergency
Management from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the sum of Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Department of Emergency Management by law.
Req. No. 10520 Page 1

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-11633 JM 01/13/25

















Req. No. 10520 Page 2